Missouri, session 2026, SB1212.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Sections 137.115 and 137.245, RSMo, are
2 repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
3 known as sections 137.115 and 137.245, to read as follows:
1 137.115. 1. All other laws to the contrary
2 notwithstanding, the assessor or the assessor's deputies in
3 all counties of this state including the City of St. Louis
4 shall annually make a list of all real and tangible personal
5 property taxable in the assessor's city, county, town or
6 district. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of
7 this section and section 137.078, for all calendar years
8 ending on or before December 31, 2026, the assessor shall
9 annually assess all personal property at thirty-three and
10 one-third percent of its true value in money as of January
11 first of each calendar year. Except as otherwise provided
12 in subsection 3 of this section and section 137.078, for all
13 calendar years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, the
14 assessor shall annually assess all personal property
15 pursuant to subsection 6 of this section. The assessor
16 shall annually assess all real property, including any new
17 construction and improvements to real property, and
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1212 2
18 possessory interests in real property at the percent of its
19 true value in money as set in subsection 5 of this section
20 for all calendar years ending on or before December 31,
21 2026, and as set in subsection 6 of this section for all
22 calendar years beginning on or after January 1, 2027. The
23 true value in money of any possessory interest in real
24 property in subclass (3), where such real property is on or
25 lies within the ultimate airport boundary as shown by a
26 federal airport layout plan, as defined by 14 CFR 151.5, of
27 a commercial airport having a FAR Part 139 certification and
28 owned by a political subdivision, shall be the otherwise
29 applicable true value in money of any such possessory
30 interest in real property, less the total dollar amount of
31 costs paid by a party, other than the political subdivision,
32 towards any new construction or improvements on such real
33 property completed after January 1, 2008, and which are
34 included in the above-mentioned possessory interest,
35 regardless of the year in which such costs were incurred or
36 whether such costs were considered in any prior year. The
37 assessor shall annually assess all real property in the
38 following manner: new assessed values shall be determined
39 as of January first of each odd-numbered year and shall be
40 entered in the assessor's books; those same assessed values
41 shall apply in the following even-numbered year, except for
42 new construction and property improvements which shall be
43 valued as though they had been completed as of January first
44 of the preceding odd-numbered year. The assessor may call
45 at the office, place of doing business, or residence of each
46 person required by this chapter to list property, and
47 require the person to make a correct statement of all
48 taxable tangible personal property owned by the person or
49 under his or her care, charge or management, taxable in the

SB 1212 3
50 county. On or before January first of each even-numbered
51 year, the assessor shall prepare and submit a two-year
52 assessment maintenance plan to the county governing body and
53 the state tax commission for their respective approval or
54 modification. The county governing body shall approve and
55 forward such plan or its alternative to the plan to the
56 state tax commission by February first. If the county
57 governing body fails to forward the plan or its alternative
58 to the plan to the state tax commission by February first,
59 the assessor's plan shall be considered approved by the
60 county governing body. If the state tax commission fails to
61 approve a plan and if the state tax commission and the
62 assessor and the governing body of the county involved are
63 unable to resolve the differences, in order to receive state
64 cost-share funds outlined in section 137.750, the county or
65 the assessor shall petition the administrative hearing
66 commission, by May first, to decide all matters in dispute
67 regarding the assessment maintenance plan. Upon agreement
68 of the parties, the matter may be stayed while the parties
69 proceed with mediation or arbitration upon terms agreed to
70 by the parties. The final decision of the administrative
71 hearing commission shall be subject to judicial review in
72 the circuit court of the county involved. In the event a
73 valuation of subclass (1) real property within any county
74 with a charter form of government, or within a city not
75 within a county, is made by a computer, computer-assisted
76 method or a computer program, the burden of proof, supported
77 by clear, convincing and cogent evidence to sustain such
78 valuation, shall be on the assessor at any hearing or
79 appeal. In any such county, unless the assessor proves
80 otherwise, there shall be a presumption that the assessment
81 was made by a computer, computer-assisted method or a

SB 1212 4
82 computer program. Such evidence shall include, but shall
83 not be limited to, the following:
84 (1) The findings of the assessor based on an appraisal
85 of the property by generally accepted appraisal techniques;
86 and
87 (2) The purchase prices from sales of at least three
88 comparable properties and the address or location thereof.
89 As used in this subdivision, the word "comparable" means
90 that:
91 (a) Such sale was closed at a date relevant to the
92 property valuation; and
93 (b) Such properties are not more than one mile from
94 the site of the disputed property, except where no similar
95 properties exist within one mile of the disputed property,
96 the nearest comparable property shall be used. Such
97 property shall be within five hundred square feet in size of
98 the disputed property, and resemble the disputed property in
99 age, floor plan, number of rooms, and other relevant
100 characteristics.
101 2. Assessors in each county of this state and the City
102 of St. Louis may send personal property assessment forms
103 through the mail.
104 3. The following items of personal property shall each
105 constitute separate subclasses of tangible personal property
106 and shall be assessed and valued for the purposes of
107 taxation at the following percentages of their true value in
108 money:
109 (1) Grain and other agricultural crops in an
110 unmanufactured condition, one-half of one percent;
111 (2) Livestock, twelve percent;
112 (3) Farm machinery, twelve percent;

SB 1212 5
113 (4) Motor vehicles which are eligible for registration
114 as and are registered as historic motor vehicles pursuant to
115 section 301.131 and aircraft which are at least twenty-five
116 years old and which are used solely for noncommercial
117 purposes and are operated less than two hundred hours per
118 year or aircraft that are home built from a kit, five
119 percent;
120 (5) Poultry, twelve percent;
121 (6) Tools and equipment used for pollution control and
122 tools and equipment used in retooling for the purpose of
123 introducing new product lines or used for making
124 improvements to existing products by any company which is
125 located in a state enterprise zone and which is identified
126 by any standard industrial classification number cited in
127 subdivision (7) of section 135.200, twenty-five percent; and
128 (7) Solar panels, racking systems, inverters, and
129 related solar equipment, components, materials, and supplies
130 installed in connection with solar photovoltaic energy
131 systems, as described in subdivision (46) of subsection 2 of
132 section 144.030, that were constructed and producing solar
133 energy prior to August 9, 2022, five percent.
134 4. The person listing the property shall enter a true
135 and correct statement of the property, in a printed blank
136 prepared for that purpose. The statement, after being
137 filled out, shall be signed and either affirmed or sworn to
138 as provided in section 137.155. The list shall then be
139 delivered to the assessor.
140 5. (1) All subclasses of real property, as such
141 subclasses are established in Section 4(b) of Article X of
142 the Missouri Constitution and defined in section 137.016,
143 shall be assessed at the following percentages of true value
144 for all calendar years ending on or before December 31,

SB 1212 6
145 2026, and as provided in subsection 6 of this section for
146 all calendar years beginning on or after January 1, 2027:
147 (a) For real property in subclass (1), nineteen
148 percent;
149 (b) For real property in subclass (2), twelve percent;
150 and
151 (c) For real property in subclass (3), thirty-two
152 percent.
153 (2) A taxpayer may apply to the county assessor, or,
154 if not located within a county, then the assessor of such
155 city, for the reclassification of such taxpayer's real
156 property if the use or purpose of such real property is
157 changed after such property is assessed under the provisions
158 of this chapter. If the assessor determines that such
159 property shall be reclassified, he or she shall determine
160 the assessment under this subsection based on the percentage
161 of the tax year that such property was classified in each
162 subclassification.
163 6. (1) As used in this subsection, the following
164 terms shall mean:
165 (a) "Allowable growth factor", the lesser of the
166 percent increase in inflation or five percent;
167 (b) "Base year percentage", the percentage of true
168 value at which the following items of personal and real
169 property shall be assessed as of January first of a calendar
170 year, as adjusted pursuant to subdivision (2) of this
171 subsection:
172 a. All personal property, except as otherwise provided
173 in subsection 3 of this section and section 137.078, thirty-
174 three and one-third percent;
175 b. All subclass (1) real property, nineteen percent;

SB 1212 7
176 c. All subclass (2) real property as described in
177 subsection 1 of section 137.017, twelve percent;
178 d. All subclass (2) real property as described in
179 subsection 4 of section 137.017, twelve percent;
180 e. All subclass (3) real property, thirty-two percent;
181 (c) "Percent increase in inflation", the percentage,
182 if any, by which the general price level increases, as
183 measured by the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers
184 for the United States, or its successor publications, as
185 defined and officially reported by the United States
186 Department of Labor, or its successor agency;
187 (d) "Total assessed value", the assessed value of a
188 subclass of real property, individually, or personal
189 property, in the aggregate, in this state as measured by
190 multiplying the true value in money of such property by the
191 base year percentage for such property.
192 (2) (a) For all calendar years beginning on or after
193 January 1, 2027, the state tax commission shall annually
194 calculate the total assessed value for each subclass of real
195 property, individually, and for personal property in the
196 aggregate. If the calculation for any class or subclass
197 exceeds the total assessed value for such class or subclass
198 from the previous year by more than the allowable growth
199 factor, the state tax commission shall adjust the base year
200 percentage for such class or subclass so that the total
201 assessed value for the class or subclass does not exceed the
202 total assessed value for such class or subclass from the
203 previous year by more than the allowable growth factor.
204 (b) All calculations and adjustments required by
205 paragraph (a) of this subdivision shall be completed and
206 submitted to each county assessor by no later than August
207 seventh of each year, and the assessor shall use such

SB 1212 8
208 adjusted base year percentages to assess property for that
209 tax year.
210 (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection
211 to the contrary, the state tax commission shall not adjust
212 the base year percentage for any subclass (2) real property
213 as described in subsection 1 of section 137.017.
214 7. Manufactured homes, as defined in section 700.010,
215 which are actually used as dwelling units shall be assessed
216 at the same percentage of true value as residential real
217 property for the purpose of taxation. The percentage of
218 assessment of true value for such manufactured homes shall
219 be the same as for residential real property. If the county
220 collector cannot identify or find the manufactured home when
221 attempting to attach the manufactured home for payment of
222 taxes owed by the manufactured home owner, the county
223 collector may request the county commission to have the
224 manufactured home removed from the tax books, and such
225 request shall be granted within thirty days after the
226 request is made; however, the removal from the tax books
227 does not remove the tax lien on the manufactured home if it
228 is later identified or found. For purposes of this section,
229 a manufactured home located in a manufactured home rental
230 park, rental community or on real estate not owned by the
231 manufactured home owner shall be considered personal
232 property. For purposes of this section, a manufactured home
233 located on real estate owned by the manufactured home owner
234 may be considered real property.
235 [7.] 8. Each manufactured home assessed shall be
236 considered a parcel for the purpose of reimbursement
237 pursuant to section 137.750, unless the manufactured home is
238 deemed to be real estate as defined in subsection 7 of

SB 1212 9
239 section 442.015 and assessed as a realty improvement to the
240 existing real estate parcel.
241 [8.] 9. Any amount of tax due and owing based on the
242 assessment of a manufactured home shall be included on the
243 personal property tax statement of the manufactured home
244 owner unless the manufactured home is deemed to be real
245 estate as defined in subsection 7 of section 442.015, in
246 which case the amount of tax due and owing on the assessment
247 of the manufactured home as a realty improvement to the
248 existing real estate parcel shall be included on the real
249 property tax statement of the real estate owner.
250 [9.] 10. The assessor of each county and each city not
251 within a county shall use a nationally recognized automotive
252 trade publication such as the National Automobile Dealers'
253 Association Official Used Car Guide, Kelley Blue Book,
254 Edmunds, or other similar publication as the recommended
255 guide of information for determining the true value of motor
256 vehicles described in such publication. The state tax
257 commission shall select and make available to all assessors
258 which publication shall be used. The assessor of each
259 county and each city not within a county shall use the trade-
260 in value published in the current October issue of the
261 publication selected by the state tax commission. The
262 assessor shall not use a value that is greater than the
263 average trade-in value in determining the true value of the
264 motor vehicle without performing a physical inspection of
265 the motor vehicle. For vehicles two years old or newer from
266 a vehicle's model year, the assessor may use a value other
267 than average without performing a physical inspection of the
268 motor vehicle. In the absence of a listing for a particular
269 motor vehicle in such publication, the assessor shall use
270 such information or publications that, in the assessor's

SB 1212 10
271 judgment, will fairly estimate the true value in money of
272 the motor vehicle. For motor vehicles with a true value of
273 less than fifty thousand dollars as of January 1, 2025, the
274 assessor shall not assess such motor vehicle for an amount
275 greater than such motor vehicle was assessed in the previous
276 year, provided that such motor vehicle was properly assessed
277 in the previous year.
278 [10.] 11. Before the assessor may increase the
279 assessed valuation of any parcel of subclass (1) real
280 property by more than fifteen percent since the last
281 assessment, excluding increases due to new construction or
282 improvements, the assessor shall conduct a physical
283 inspection of such property.
284 [11.] 12. If a physical inspection is required,
285 pursuant to subsection [10] 11 of this section, the assessor
286 shall notify the property owner of that fact in writing and
287 shall provide the owner clear written notice of the owner's
288 rights relating to the physical inspection. If a physical
289 inspection is required, the property owner may request that
290 an interior inspection be performed during the physical
291 inspection. The owner shall have no less than thirty days
292 to notify the assessor of a request for an interior physical
293 inspection.
294 [12.] 13. A physical inspection, as required by
295 subsection [10] 11 of this section, shall include, but not
296 be limited to, an on-site personal observation and review of
297 all exterior portions of the land and any buildings and
298 improvements to which the inspector has or may reasonably
299 and lawfully gain external access, and shall include an
300 observation and review of the interior of any buildings or
301 improvements on the property upon the timely request of the
302 owner pursuant to subsection [11] 12 of this section. Mere

SB 1212 11
303 observation of the property via a drive-by inspection or the
304 like shall not be considered sufficient to constitute a
305 physical inspection as required by this section.
306 [13.] 14. A county or city collector may accept credit
307 cards as proper form of payment of outstanding property tax
308 or license due. No county or city collector may charge
309 surcharge for payment by credit card which exceeds the fee
310 or surcharge charged by the credit card bank, processor, or
311 issuer for its service. A county or city collector may
312 accept payment by electronic transfers of funds in payment
313 of any tax or license and charge the person making such
314 payment a fee equal to the fee charged the county by the
315 bank, processor, or issuer of such electronic payment.
316 [14.] 15. Any county or city not within a county in
317 this state may, by an affirmative vote of the governing body
318 of such county, opt out of the provisions of this section
319 and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by
320 house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general assembly,
321 second regular session and section 137.073 as modified by
322 house committee substitute for senate substitute for senate
323 committee substitute for senate bill no. 960, ninety-second
324 general assembly, second regular session, for the next year
325 of the general reassessment, prior to January first of any
326 year. No county or city not within a county shall exercise
327 this opt-out provision after implementing the provisions of
328 this section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as
329 enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
330 assembly, second regular session and section 137.073 as
331 modified by house committee substitute for senate substitute
332 for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960,
333 ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, in a
334 year of general reassessment. For the purposes of applying

SB 1212 12
335 the provisions of this subsection, a political subdivision
336 contained within two or more counties where at least one of
337 such counties has opted out and at least one of such
338 counties has not opted out shall calculate a single tax rate
339 as in effect prior to the enactment of house bill no. 1150
340 of the ninety-first general assembly, second regular
341 session. A governing body of a city not within a county or
342 a county that has opted out under the provisions of this
343 subsection may choose to implement the provisions of this
344 section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as
345 enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
346 assembly, second regular session, and section 137.073 as
347 modified by house committee substitute for senate substitute
348 for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960,
349 ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, for
350 the next year of general reassessment, by an affirmative
351 vote of the governing body prior to December thirty-first of
352 any year.
353 [15.] 16. The governing body of any city of the third
354 classification with more than twenty-six thousand three
355 hundred but fewer than twenty-six thousand seven hundred
356 inhabitants located in any county that has exercised its
357 authority to opt out under subsection 14 of this section may
358 levy separate and differing tax rates for real and personal
359 property only if such city bills and collects its own
360 property taxes or satisfies the entire cost of the billing
361 and collection of such separate and differing tax rates.
362 Such separate and differing rates shall not exceed such
363 city's tax rate ceiling.
364 [16.] 17. Any portion of real property that is
365 available as reserve for strip, surface, or coal mining for
366 minerals for purposes of excavation for future use or sale

SB 1212 13
367 to others that has not been bonded and permitted under
368 chapter 444 shall be assessed based upon how the real
369 property is currently being used. Any information provided
370 to a county assessor, state tax commission, state agency, or
371 political subdivision responsible for the administration of
372 tax policies shall, in the performance of its duties, make
373 available all books, records, and information requested,
374 except such books, records, and information as are by law
375 declared confidential in nature, including individually
376 identifiable information regarding a specific taxpayer or
377 taxpayer's mine property. For purposes of this subsection,
378 "mine property" shall mean all real property that is in use
379 or readily available as a reserve for strip, surface, or
380 coal mining for minerals for purposes of excavation for
381 current or future use or sale to others that has been bonded
382 and permitted under chapter 444.
1 137.245. 1. The assessor shall make out and return to
2 the county governing body, on or before the first day of
3 [July] June in every year, the assessor's book, verified by
4 an affidavit annexed thereto, in the following words:
5 "______ being duly sworn, makes oath and
6 says that such person has made diligent efforts
7 to ascertain all the taxable property being or
8 situate, on the first day of January last past,
9 in the county of which such person is assessor;
10 that, so far as such person has been able to
11 ascertain the same, it is correctly set forth in
12 the foregoing book, in the manner and the value
13 thereof stated therein, according to the mode
14 required by law".
15 2. The clerk of the county governing body shall
16 immediately make out an abstract of the assessment book,

SB 1212 14
17 showing aggregate footings of the different columns, so as
18 to set forth the aggregate amounts of the different kinds of
19 real and tangible personal property and the valuation
20 thereof, and forward the abstract to the state tax
21 commission. Failure of the clerk to make out and forward
22 the abstract to the state tax commission on or before the
23 twentieth day of [July] June is a misdemeanor.
24 3. The clerk of the county governing body in all
25 counties, and the assessor in St. Louis City, shall make out
26 an abstract of the assessment book showing the aggregate
27 amounts of different kinds of real, personal and other
28 tangible property and the valuations of each for each
29 political subdivision in the county entitled to levy ad
30 valorem taxes on property except for municipalities
31 maintaining their own tax or assessment books. The clerk of
32 each county, and the assessor in St. Louis City, shall
33 forward a copy of the aggregate valuation listed in the tax
34 book for each political subdivision, except counties and
35 municipalities maintaining their own tax or assessment
36 books, to the governing body of the subdivision by the
37 twentieth day of [July] June of each year. In any county
38 which contains a city with a population of one hundred
39 thousand or more inhabitants which is located within a
40 county of the first classification that adjoins no other
41 county of the first classification, the clerk of the county
42 shall provide the final revised assessed valuation listed in
43 the tax book for each school district within the county to
44 each such district on or before the fifteenth day of August
45 of each year. The clerk of any county of the first
46 classification with a charter form of government and with
47 more than six hundred thousand but less than seven hundred
48 thousand inhabitants shall forward a copy of the aggregate

SB 1212 15
49 valuation listed in the tax book for school districts within
50 the county to each such district by the fifteenth day of
51 July of each year.
✓